District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

2-308.16

Employer interference with employee disclosures; liability of employer; remedies of employee.

Recodified as § 2-381.04.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 816, 32 DCR 7396
as added May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(g), 45 DCR 1687
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 10(c), 46DCR 2118